Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6003
Adjusted risk-based capital report, defined.

Adjusted risk-based capital report means a risk-based capital report which has been adjusted by the director in accordance with subsection (6) of section 44-6015.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 34;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 5.